New York, session 2025-2026, A9680.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 7 of section 4403-f of the 2 public health law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (v-e) to read 3 as follows: 4 (v-e) Notwithstanding clause thirteen of subparagraph (v) of this 5 paragraph, the department shall authorize one or more demonstration 6 projects that permit a managed long-term care plan to enroll persons 7 that are permanently placed in a nursing home and to manage the nursing 8 home benefit in one or more rural areas, as such term is defined in 9 section twenty-nine hundred fifty-one of this chapter. Such plan shall 10 be approved by the department to operate under this subparagraph in one 11 or more such rural areas, in order to study the effectiveness of managed 12 care models in assisting permanently-placed nursing home residents to 13 return to community-based settings. Nothing in this subparagraph shall 14 modify or alter any requirements of this section for plans authorized to 15 enroll persons under this subparagraph. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 17 the amendments to paragraph (b) of subdivision 7 of section 4403-f of 18 the public health law made by section one of this act shall not affect 19 the expiration of such paragraph pursuant to subdivision (i) of section 20 111 of part H of chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, as amended, and shall 21 be deemed to expire therewith; provided, further, that the amendments to 22 section 4403-f of the public health law made by section one of this act 23 shall not affect the repeal of such section pursuant to chapter 659 of 24 the laws of 1997, as amended, and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02350-01-5